src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-1Y-miyrr_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - miârr e-stem sea/meri: # Noun - full paradigm
     miârr+N+Sg+Nom: miârr
     miârr+N+Sg+Gen: miâr
     miârr+N+Sg+Acc: miâr
     miârr+N+Sg+Ill: mieʹrˈre
     miârr+N+Sg+Loc: miârâst
     miârr+N+Sg+Com: miârin
     miârr+N+Ess: miârrân
     miârr+N+Par: miârrâd
     miârr+N+Sg+Abe: [miârtaa, miârtää]
     miârr+N+Pl+Nom: miâr
     miârr+N+Pl+Gen: miâri
     miârr+N+Pl+Acc: miârid
     miârr+N+Pl+Ill: miârid
     miârr+N+Pl+Loc: miârin
     miârr+N+Pl+Com: miârivuiʹm
     miârr+N+Pl+Abe: [miâritaa, miâritää]
